California statutes. Penal Code
(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that the statement in Section 1000.4, that “successful completion of a deferred entry of judgment program shall not, without the defendant’s consent, be used in any way that could result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate” constitutes misinformation about the actual consequences of making a plea in the case of some defendants, including all noncitizen defendants, because the disposition of the case may cause adverse consequences, including adverse immigration consequences.

(2) Accordingly, the Legislature finds and declares that based on this misinformation and the
 potential harm, the defendant’s prior plea is invalid.

(b) For the above-specified reason, in any case in which a defendant was granted deferred entry of judgment on or after January 1, 1997, has performed satisfactorily during the period in which deferred entry of judgment was granted, and for whom the criminal charge or charges were dismissed pursuant to Section 1000.3, the court shall, upon request of the defendant, permit the defendant to withdraw the plea of guilty or nolo contendere and enter a plea of not guilty, and the court shall dismiss the complaint or information against the defendant. If court records showing the case resolution are no longer available, the defendant’s declaration, under penalty of perjury, that the charges were dismissed after he or she completed the requirements for deferred entry of judgment,
 shall be presumed to be true if the defendant has submitted a copy of his or her state summary criminal history information maintained by the Department of Justice that either shows that the defendant successfully completed the deferred entry of judgment program or that the record is incomplete in that it does not show a final disposition. For purposes of this section, a final disposition means that the state summary criminal history information shows either a dismissal after completion of the program or a sentence after termination of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   (AB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.44.

(a) The Counties of Sacramento and Yolo may offer a voluntary secured residential treatment pilot program, known as “Hope California,” consistent with this section for individuals suffering from substance use disorders (SUDs) who have been convicted of drug-motivated felony crimes that qualify pursuant to the criteria and conditions described in subdivisions (b) and (c). If offered, the pilot programs shall align with the resolutions adopted by the counties in recognition of the goal of ensuring that people with behavioral health conditions receive treatment out of custody wherever possible. The counties may offer the pilot program to eligible individuals if the program meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The program facility is licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services as an alcoholism or drug abuse recovery or treatment facility pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 11834.01) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) (A) The program facility is a clinical setting managed and staffed by the county’s health and human services agency (HHSA) with oversight provided by the county’s probation department.

(B) The program facility shall not be a jail, prison, or other correctional setting.

(C) The program facility shall be secured but shall not include a lockdown setting.

(3) The individual, upon a judge pronouncing a sentence to be served in a county jail or state prison, shall choose and consent to participate in the voluntary program in lieu of incarceration.

(4) The program is limited to one facility site per county.

(5) The State Department of Health Care Services monitors the program facility to ensure the health, safety, and well-being of program participants.

(6) The State Department of Health Care Services has authority to access the program facility to investigate complaints by program participants and to ensure the facility complies with applicable statutes and regulations.

(7) The program facility ensures that participants have visitation rights, including through the use of a telephone.

(8) The county develops and staffs the program in partnership with relevant community-based organizations and drug treatment service providers to provide support services, including, but not limited to, employment skill assessments, money management, technology education, tutoring, career planning, developing resumes and cover letters, and searching and applying for employment.

(9) HHSA ensures that a risk, needs, and biopsychosocial assessment, utilizing the Multidimensional Assessment of the American Society of Addiction Medicine (ASAM), as part of the ASAM Criteria, be performed for each individual identified as a candidate for the program.

(10) The participant’s treatment, in terms of length and intensity, within the program is based on the findings of the risk, needs, and biopsychosocial assessment and the recommendations of treatment providers that may include an addiction medicine physician.

(11) The program adopts the Treatment Criteria of ASAM. The program may take into consideration evolving best practices in the SUD treatment community.

(12) The program has a comprehensive written curriculum that informs the operations of the program and outlines the treatment and intervention modalities.

(13) The program provides an individualized, medically assisted treatment plan for each resident,
 including, but not limited to, medically assisted treatment options and counseling based on the recommendations of a substance use disorder specialist, which may include a medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy specializing in addiction medicine.

(14) A judge determines the length of the treatment program after being informed by, and based on, the risk, needs, and biopsychosocial assessment and recommendations of treatment providers. After leaving the secured residential treatment facility, the participant continues outpatient treatment for a period of time and may also be referred to a “step-down” residential treatment facility, subject to the time limit described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(15) A judge shall also determine that the program will be carried out
 in lieu of a jail or prison sentence after making a finding that the defendant’s decision to choose the alternative treatment program is knowing, intelligent, and voluntary.

(16) The program provides, for each participant successfully leaving the program, a comprehensive continuum of care plan that includes recommendations for outpatient care, counseling, housing recommendations, and other vital components of successful recovery.

(17) To the extent permitted under federal and state law, treatment provided to a participant during the program is reimbursable under the Medi-Cal program, if the participant is a Medi-Cal beneficiary and the treatment is a covered benefit under the Medi-Cal program. If treatment services provided to a participant during the program are not
 reimbursable under the Medi-Cal program or through the participant’s personal health care coverage, funds allocated to the state from the 2021 Multistate Opioid Settlement Agreement, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature, may be used to reimburse those treatment services to the extent consistent with the terms of the Settlement Agreement and the Final Judgment (People v. McKinsey & Co. (Alameda County Superior Court, No. RG21087649, Feb. 4, 2021)).

(18) (A) An outcomes assessment of the secured residential treatment pilot program is completed by an independent evaluator and submitted to the Assembly Committee on Health, the Assembly Committee on Public Safety, the Senate Committee on Health, the Senate Committee on Public Safety, and the Legislature by October 1, 2028.

(B) The outcomes assessment shall include pilot program data, including overall data and data by county, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) A summary of the pertinent data collected under paragraphs (19) and (20) over the course of the pilot program.

(ii) The clinical efficacy of the secured residential treatment pilot program based on the data collected under paragraphs (19) and (20).

(iii) The effects of the secured residential treatment pilot program on participant recidivism and sustainable recovery.

(iv) A recommendation for the continuation and expansion of the
 secured residential treatment pilot project model beyond the pilot program.

(C) The outcomes assessment shall not be performed or managed by the State Department of Health Care Services but may be performed by a postsecondary institution.

(D) The independent evaluator may be provided with criminal offender record information, if necessary for the completion of the outcomes assessment, as provided in Section 13202.

(19) The county collects and monitors all of the following data for participants in the program:

(A) The participant’s demographic information, including age, gender, race, ethnicity, marital status, familial status, and employment status.

(B) The participant’s criminal history.

(C) The participant’s risk level, as determined by the risk, needs, and biopsychosocial assessment.

(D) The treatment provided to the participant during the program, and if the participant completed that treatment.

(E) The participant’s outcome at the time of program completion, six months after completion, and one year after completion, including subsequent arrests and convictions.

(20) The county reports all
 of the following information annually to the State Department of Health Care Services and, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature, excluding any personally identifiable information of participants:

(A) The risk, needs, and biopsychosocial assessment tool used for the program.

(B) The curriculum used by each program.

(C) The number of participants with a program length other than one year and the alternative program lengths used.

(D) Individual data on the number of participants participating in the program.

(E) Individual data for the items described in paragraph
 (19).

(F) A one- and three-year evaluation of the number of subsequent arrests and convictions of the participants.

(b) (1) Eligible drug-motivated crimes shall include any felony crime other than the following:

(A) Sex crimes listed in subdivision (c) of Section 290.

(B) A “serious felony” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 or in Section 1192.8.

(C) A “violent felony” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(D) “Domestic violence” as defined in the Domestic Violence Prevention Act (Division 10
 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Family Code).

(E) Driving under the influence in violation of Section 191.5 of this code or Section 23152, 23153, 23550, or 23550.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a “nonviolent drug possession offense” specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1210 may not be diverted pursuant to this program.

(c) (1) At the time of sentencing or pronouncement of judgment in which sentencing is imposed, the judge shall offer the defendant voluntary participation in the pilot program, as an alternative to a jail or prison sentence that the judge would otherwise impose, consistent with the other provisions of this section and if all of
 the following conditions are met:

(A) The defendant’s crime was caused in whole or in part by the defendant’s SUD.

(B) The defendant’s crime meets the criteria described in subdivision (b).

(C) The judge makes their determination based on the recommendations of the treatment providers who conducted the assessment, on a finding by HHSA that the defendant’s participation in the program would be appropriate, and on the report described in subdivision (d).

(2) The amount of time in the secured residential treatment facility shall be determined by the recommendations of the treatment providers who conducted the assessment. The amount of time,
 combined with any outpatient treatment or “step-down” residential treatment pursuant to the program, shall not exceed the term of imprisonment to which the defendant would otherwise be sentenced, not including any additional term of imprisonment for enhancements, for the drug-motivated crime. The court shall not place the defendant on probation for the underlying offense. The defendant shall be eligible to receive credits pursuant to Section 4019.

(3) During the period that an individual is participating in the pilot program, the individual shall be on supervision with the probation department.

(d) To assist the court in making the determination as to whether to offer the defendant placement in the secured residential treatment program pursuant to subdivision (c), a report shall be
 prepared with input from any of the interested parties, including the district attorney, the attorney for the participant, the probation department, HHSA, and any contracted drug treatment program provider.

(e) If, at any time during the individual’s participation in the program, it is determined by the treatment providers or program administrators that continued participation in the program would not be in the best interests of the individual, other participants, or the program itself, the treatment providers or program administrators may recommend to the court that the individual’s participation be terminated and that the individual be transferred out of the secured residential treatment program.

(f) If the court, based on the recommendations of the treatment providers or
 program administrators, determines that the participant should be transferred out of the secured residential treatment phase of the program prior to the end of the original order, the court shall make that subsequent order, and the participant shall complete the remainder of the original sentence imposed prior to their consent to enter the program.

(g) If, at any time during the individual’s participation in the program, the individual determines that they no longer wish to participate in the program, the individual may make a request to the court for termination of their participation and be transferred out of the secured residential treatment program to complete the remainder of their originally imposed sentence after accounting for any credits to which the individual is entitled pursuant to Section 4019.

(h) If the treatment providers make a recommendation to the court that the participant should be released prior to the end of the original order based on the treatment providers’ assessment that the participant no longer needs to be in the secured residential treatment program, the court shall make that subsequent order, and paragraph (16) of subdivision (a) shall apply.

(i) If the participant successfully completes the court-ordered drug treatment pursuant to this program, the conviction shall be set aside, and the court shall dismiss the accusation or information against
 the participant. The court shall also have discretion to
 set aside the conviction and to dismiss the accusation or information of any previous drug possession or drug use crimes on the participant’s record, including those offenses listed in Sections 11350, 11364, 11377, and 11550 of the Health and Safety Code. A participant’s successful completion of treatment shall be defined and determined by the treatment providers and not by the court, district attorney’s office, or probation department and does not require the participant to complete the duration of the treatment originally ordered by the court.

(j) The court shall ensure that the rights of any victim pursuant to Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution (Marsy’s Law) are honored before
 setting aside the conviction and dismissing the accusation or information.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before July 1, 2029, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 685, Sec. 2.   (AB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of July 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.45.

(a) When a person was under 18 years of age at the time of commission of a misdemeanor and is eligible for, or has previously received, the relief provided by Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a, that person, in a proceeding under Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a, or a separate proceeding, may petition the court for an order sealing the record of conviction and other official records in the case, including records of arrests resulting in the criminal proceeding and records relating to other offenses charged in the accusatory pleading, whether the defendant was acquitted or charges were dismissed. If the court finds that the person was under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the misdemeanor, and is eligible for relief under Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a or has previously received that relief, it may issue its order granting the
 relief prayed for. Thereafter the conviction, arrest, or other proceeding shall be deemed not to have occurred, and the petitioner may answer accordingly any question relating to their occurrence.

(b) This section applies to convictions that occurred before, as well as those that occur after, the effective date of this section.

(c) This section shall not apply to offenses for which registration is required under Section 290, to violations of Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or to misdemeanor violations of the Vehicle Code relating to operation of a vehicle or of a local ordinance relating to operation, standing, stopping, or parking of a motor vehicle.

(d) This section does not apply to a person convicted of more than one offense, whether the second or additional convictions
 occurred in the same action in which the conviction as to which relief is sought occurred or in another action, except in the following cases:

(1) One of the offenses includes the other or others.

(2) The other conviction or convictions were for the following:

(A) Misdemeanor violations of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 21000) to 9 (commencing with Section 22500), inclusive, Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 23100), or Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 23250) of Division 11 of the Vehicle Code, other than Section 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, 23153, or 23220.

(B) Violation of a local ordinance relating to the operation, stopping, standing, or parking of a motor vehicle.

(3) The
 other conviction or convictions consisted of any combination of paragraphs (1) and (2).

(e) This section shall apply in a case in which a person was under 21 years of age at the time of the commission of an offense as to which this section is made applicable if that offense was committed prior to March 7, 1973.

(f) (1) A petition for relief under this section shall not be denied due to an unfulfilled order of restitution or restitution fine.

(2) An unfulfilled order of restitution or a restitution fine shall not be grounds for finding that a defendant did not fulfil the conditions of probation for the entire period of probation.

(3) When the court considers a petition for relief under this section, in its discretion and in the
 interest of justice, an unpaid order of restitution or restitution fine shall not be grounds for denial of the petition for relief.

(g) In an action or proceeding based upon defamation, a court, upon a showing of good cause, may order the records sealed under this section to be opened and admitted into evidence. The records shall be confidential and shall be available for inspection only by the court, jury, parties, counsel for the parties, and any other person who is authorized by the court to inspect them. Upon the judgment in the action or proceeding becoming final, the court shall order the records sealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 13.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.47.

(a) A person who was found to be a person described in Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code by reason of the commission of an offense described in subdivision (b) of Section 647 or in former Section 653.22 may, upon reaching 18 years of age, petition the court to have their record sealed, as provided in Section 781 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, except that, as pertaining to any records regarding the commission of an offense described in subdivision (b) of Section 647 or in former Section 653.22, it shall not be a requirement in granting the petition for the person to show that they have not been convicted of a felony or of any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude, or that rehabilitation has been attained to the
 satisfaction of the court. Upon granting the petition, all records relating to the violation or violations of subdivision (b) of Section 647 or of former Section 653.22, or both, shall be sealed pursuant to Section 781 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The relief provided by this section does not apply to a person adjudicated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 647 who paid money or any other valuable thing, or attempted to pay money or any other valuable thing, to any person for the purpose of prostitution as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 647.

(c) This section applies to adjudications that occurred before, as well as those that occur after, the effective date of this section.

(d) A petition granted
 pursuant to this section does not authorize the sealing of any part of a person’s record that is unrelated to a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 647.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 86, Sec. 7.   (SB 357)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.49.

If a defendant has been convicted of solicitation or prostitution, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 647, and if the defendant has completed any term of probation for that conviction, the defendant may petition the court for relief under this section. If the defendant can establish by clear and convincing evidence that the conviction was the result of his or her status as a victim of human trafficking, the court may issue an order that does all of the following:

(a) Sets forth a finding that the petitioner was a victim of human trafficking when he or she committed the crime.

(b) Orders any of the relief described in Section 1203.4.

(c) Notifies the Department of Justice that the petitioner was a victim of human trafficking when he or she committed the crime and the relief that has been ordered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 708, Sec. 4.   (AB 1585)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.5.

The chief probation officers, assistant probation officers, and deputy probation officers appointed in accordance with Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 27770) of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code shall be ex officio adult chief probation officers, assistant adult probation officers, and deputy adult probation officers except in any county or city and county whose charter provides for the separate office of adult probation officer. When the separate office of adult probation officer has been established he or she shall perform all the duties of probation officers except for matters under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 28.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.7.

(a) Either at the time of the arrest for a crime of any person over 16 years of age, or at the time of the plea or verdict of guilty, the probation officer of the county of the jurisdiction of the crime shall, when so directed by the court, inquire into the antecedents, character, history, family environment and offense of that person. The probation officer shall report that information to the court and file a written report in the records of the court. The report shall contain his or her recommendation for or against the release of the person on probation.

(b) If that person is released on probation and committed to the care of the probation officer, the officer shall keep a complete and accurate record of the history of the case in court and of the name of the probation officer, and his or her acts in connection with the case. This information shall include the age, sex, nativity, residence, education, habits of temperance, marital status, and the conduct, employment, occupation, parents’ occupation, and the condition of the person committed to his or her care during the term of probation, and the result of probation. This record shall constitute a part of the records of the court and shall at all times be open to the inspection of the court or any person appointed by the court for that purpose, as well as of all magistrates and the chief of police or other head of the police, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

(c) Five years after termination of probation in any case subject to this section, the probation officer may destroy any records and papers in his or her possession relating to the case.

(d) The probation officer shall furnish to each person released on probation and committed to his or her care, a written statement of the terms and conditions of probation, and shall report to the court or judge appointing him or her, any violation or breach of the terms and conditions imposed by the court on the person placed in his or her care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 25.1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.71.

Any of the duties of the probation officer may be performed by a deputy probation officer and shall be performed by him or her whenever detailed to perform those by the probation officer; and it shall be the duty of the probation officer to see that the deputy probation officer performs his or her duties.

The probation officer and each deputy probation officer shall have, as to the person so committed to the care of the probation officer or deputy probation officer, the powers of a peace officer.

The probation officers and deputy probation officers shall serve as such probation officers in all courts having original jurisdiction of criminal actions in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 473, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.72.

Except as provided in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1203, no court shall pronounce judgment upon any defendant, as to whom the court has requested a probation report pursuant to Section 1203.7, unless a copy of the probation report has been made available to the court, the prosecuting attorney, and the defendant or his or her attorney, at least two days or, upon the request of the defendant, five days prior to the time fixed by the court for consideration of the report with respect to pronouncement of judgment. The report shall be filed with the clerk of the court as a record in the case at the time the court considers the report.

If the defendant is not represented by an attorney, the court, upon ordering the probation report, shall also order the probation officer who prepares the report to discuss its contents with the defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 787, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.73.

The probation officers and deputy probation officers in all counties of the state shall be allowed those necessary incidental expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as required by any law of this state, as may be authorized by a judge of the superior court; and the same shall be a charge upon the county in which the court appointing them has jurisdiction and shall be paid out of the county treasury upon a warrant issued therefor by the county auditor upon the order of the court; provided, however, that in counties in which the probation officer is appointed by the board of supervisors, the expenses shall be authorized by the probation officer and claims therefor shall be audited, allowed and paid in the same manner as other county claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 787, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.74.

Upon a determination that, in his or her opinion, staff and financial resources available to him or her are insufficient to meet his or her statutory or court ordered responsibilities, the probation officer shall immediately notify the presiding judge of the superior court and the board of supervisors of the county, or city and county, in writing. The notification shall explain which responsibilities cannot be met and what resources are necessary in order that statutory or court ordered responsibilities can be properly discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 473, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.8.

(a) A county may develop a multiagency plan to prepare and enhance nonviolent felony offenders’ successful reentry into the community. The plan shall be developed by, and have the concurrence of, the presiding judge, the chief probation officer, the district attorney, the local custodial agency, and the public defender, or their designees, and shall be submitted to the board of supervisors for its approval. The plan shall provide that when a report prepared pursuant to Section 1203.10 recommends a state prison commitment, the report shall also include, but not be limited to, the offender’s treatment, literacy, and vocational needs. Any sentence imposed pursuant to this section shall include a recommendation for completion while in state prison, all relevant programs to address those needs identified in the assessment.

(b) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is authorized to enter into an agreement with up to three counties to implement subdivision (a) and to provide funding for the purpose of the probation department carrying out the assessment. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, to the extent feasible, shall provide to the offender all programs pursuant to the court’s recommendation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 603, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.9.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), whenever a person is released on probation or mandatory supervision, the court, upon noticed motion, shall transfer the case to the superior court in any other county in which the person resides permanently with the stated intention to remain for the duration of probation or mandatory supervision, unless the transferring court determines that the transfer would be inappropriate and states its reasons on the record.

(2) Upon notice of the motion for transfer, the court of the proposed receiving county may provide comments for the record regarding the proposed transfer, following procedures set forth in rules of court developed by the Judicial Council for this purpose, pursuant to subdivision (f). The
 court and the probation department shall give the matter of investigating those transfers precedence over all actions or proceedings therein, except actions or proceedings to which special precedence is given by law, to the end that all those transfers shall be completed expeditiously.

(3) If victim restitution was ordered as a condition of probation or mandatory supervision, the transferring court shall determine the amount of restitution before the transfer unless the court finds that the determination cannot be made within a reasonable time from when the motion for transfer is made. If a case is transferred without a determination of the amount of restitution, the transferring court shall complete the determination as soon as practicable. In all other aspects, except as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e), the court of the receiving county shall have full jurisdiction over the matter upon transfer as provided in subdivision (b).

(4) The receiving court shall send a receipt of records to the transferring court including the new case number, if any. The receipt of records shall be in a mutually agreed upon format.

(5) Pursuant to Section 13151, the transferring court shall report to the Department of Justice that probation or mandatory supervision was transferred, once the receiving court accepts the transfer. A probation or mandatory supervision transfer report shall identify the receiving court and the new case number, if any.

(b) The court of the receiving county shall accept the entire jurisdiction over the case effective the date that the transferring court orders the transfer.

(c) The order of transfer shall contain an order committing the probationer or supervised person to
 the care and custody of the probation officer of the receiving county. A copy of the orders and any probation reports shall be transmitted to the court and probation officer of the receiving county within two weeks of the finding that the person does permanently reside in or has permanently moved to that county, and the receiving court shall have entire jurisdiction over the case, except as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e), with the like power to again request transfer of the case whenever it seems proper.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) and except as provided in subdivision (e), if the transferring court has ordered the defendant to pay fines, forfeitures, penalties, assessments, or restitution, the transfer order shall require that those and any other amounts ordered by the transferring court that are still unpaid at the time of transfer be paid by the defendant to the collection program for the transferring
 court for proper distribution and accounting once collected.

(2) The receiving court and receiving county probation department shall not impose additional local fees and costs.

(e) (1) Upon approval of a transferring court, a receiving court may elect to collect all of the court-ordered payments from a defendant attributable to the case under which the defendant is being supervised, provided, however, that the collection program for the receiving court transmits the revenue collected to the collection program for the transferring court for deposit, accounting, and distribution. A collection program for the receiving court shall not charge administrative fees for collections performed for the collection program for the transferring court.

(2) A collection program for a receiving court collecting
 funds for a collection program for a transferring court pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not report revenue owed or collected on behalf of the collection program for the transferring court as part of those collections required to be reported annually by the court to the Judicial Council.

(f) The Judicial Council shall promulgate rules of court for procedures by which the proposed receiving county shall receive notice of the motion for transfer and by which responsive comments may be transmitted to the court of the transferring county. The Judicial Council shall adopt rules providing factors for the court’s consideration when determining the appropriateness of a transfer, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Permanency of residence of the person released on probation or mandatory supervision.

(2) Local
 programs available for the person released on probation or mandatory supervision.

(3) Restitution orders and victim issues.

(g) The Judicial Council shall consider adoption of rules of court as it deems appropriate to implement the collection, accounting, and disbursement requirements of subdivisions (d) and (e).

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 23.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.10.

(a) At the time of the plea or verdict of guilty of any person over 18 years of age, a probation officer of the county of the jurisdiction of the criminal shall, when so directed by the court, inquire into the antecedents, character, history, family environment, and offense of such person, and must report the same to the court and file his or her report in writing in the records of such court. When directed, his or her report shall contain a recommendation for or against the release for the person on probation. If any such person shall be released on probation and committed to the supervision of a probation officer, such officer shall keep a complete and accurate record in suitable books of the history of the case and supervision, including the
 names of probation officers assigned to the case, and their actions in connection with the case; also the age, sex, nativity, residence, education, habit of temperance, whether married or single, and the conduct, employment and occupation, and parents’ occupation, if relevant, and condition of such person during the term of the probation and the result of the probation. The record of the probation officer is a part of the records of the court, and shall at all times be open to the inspection of the court or of any person appointed by, or allowed access by order of, the court for that purpose, as well as of all magistrates, and the chief of police, or other heads of the police, and other probation agencies, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

(b) Five years after termination of probation in any case subject to this section, the probation officer may destroy any records and papers in his or her possession relating to such
 case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 59, Sec. 4.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.11.

A probation or parole officer or parole agent of the Department of Corrections may serve any process regarding the issuance of a temporary restraining order or other protective order against a person committed to the care of the probation or parole officer or parole agent when the person appears for an appointment with the probation or parole officer or parole agent at their office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 866, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.12.

The probation officer shall furnish to each person who has been released on probation, and committed to his care, a written statement of the terms and conditions of his probation unless such a statement has been furnished by the court, and shall report to the court, or judge, releasing such person on probation, any violation or breach of the terms and conditions imposed by such court on the person placed in his care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.13.

The probation officer of any county may establish, or assist in the establishment of, any public council or committee having as its object the prevention of crime, and may cooperate with or participate in the work of any such councils or committees for the purpose of preventing or decreasing crime, including the improving of recreational, health, and other conditions in the community.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.14.
